Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB814.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 315.15. Tax Credit for Spouses of First Responders Killed in Line of Duty.--(a) A resident taxpayer whose spouse is a first responder who dies during, or as a result of, the performance of duties as a first responder shall be allowed a tax credit against the tax otherwise due under this article. The 123456789101112131415161718192021 tax credit shall be equal to one hundred per cent of the amount paid by the resident taxpayer to a political subdivision against the real property tax levied on the resident taxpayer's principal residence. The tax credit may not exceed the amount of the tax due during the taxable year.(b) A resident taxpayer is ineligible to claim the tax credit under this section if the resident taxpayer remarries after the death of the spouse who was a first responder.(c) A resident taxpayer may not receive a rebate under Chapter 13 of the act of June 27, 2006 (1st Sp.Sess., P.L.1873, No.1), known as the Taxpayer Relief Act, or any other property tax rebate available under laws of this Commonwealth, during a tax year in which the resident taxpayer claims the tax credit under this section.(d) The department may require a resident taxpayer who claims the tax credit under this section to provide documentation in order to show sufficient evidence that a dwelling is the resident taxpayer's principal residence.(e) The department shall promulgate regulations to implement this section and shall develop written guidelines for the implementation of this section. The guidelines shall be in effect until the department promulgates regulations for the implementation of this section.(f) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"First responder." An individual who is employed or volunteers as a law enforcement officer, firefighter, emergency medical technician, ambulance driver or emergency rescue personnel.20250HB0814PN0844 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Principal residence." A premises located in this Commonwealth that a resident taxpayer uses and occupies as the resident taxpayer's primary dwelling.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0814PN0844 - 3 - 1234